Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-402
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 75-401 to 75-430, and in all rules and regulations prescribed by the commission, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Railroad carrier shall mean any common carrier engaged in the carrying of freight or passengers over any line of railroad, or part thereof, within the State of Nebraska; and

(2) Railroad shall mean any line of railroad track, or part thereof, located within the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. IV, § 2, p. 1398;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 84.